Hawaii, session 2025, SB998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that H.C.R. No. 97, H.D. 2, Regular Session of 2024, was adopted by the legislature in its final form and requested the department of accounting and general services to establish a working group to plan and construct a Hawaii first responders memorial.  The working group held its inaugural meeting in November 2024 and has scheduled regular monthly meetings to ensure progress and collaboration as the group works toward completion of the memorial.  The memorial aims to provide a lasting tribute to the first responders who have selflessly served the community and paid the ultimate price in the line of duty. The purpose of this Act is to adopt a working group recommendation by appropriating funds for the department of accounting and general services to engage a consultant to evaluate potential sites and designs for the Hawaii first responders memorial. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to hire a consultant to evaluate potential locations and designs for a Hawaii first responders memorial. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________